Utah statutes.
26-2-8.   Birth certificates -- Delayed registration.

(1) When a certificate of birth of a person born in this state has not been filed within the time provided in Subsection 26-2-5(2), a certificate of birth may be filed in accordance with department rules and subject to this section.

(2) (a)  The registrar shall mark a certificate of birth as "delayed" and show the date of registration if the certificate is registered one year or more after the date of birth.

(b)  The registrar shall abstract a summary statement of the evidence submitted in support of delayed registration onto the certificate.

(3)  When the minimum evidence required for delayed registration is not submitted or when the state registrar has reasonable cause to question the validity or adequacy of the evidence supporting the application, and the deficiencies are not corrected, the state registrar:

(a)  may not register the certificate; and

(b)  shall provide the applicant with a written statement indicating the reasons for denial of registration.

(4)  The state registrar has no duty to take further action regarding an application which is not actively pursued.



Amended by Chapter 202, 1995 General Session

